Washington statutes.
RCW 19.130.010

Legislative findings.

The legislature finds that the federal deregulation of the telephone industry provides telephone users with the opportunity to purchase and use telephone and other telecommunications equipment suited to their needs. The legislature finds that competitive markets function optimally when potential buyers have adequate information about the capabilities and reliability of the equipment offered for sale. The legislature further finds that disclosure of certain product information will benefit both buyers and sellers of telephone and other telecommunications equipment and is in the public interest.

[ 1984 c 275 s 1.]